src/defs.foma
!!!Multichar_Symbols gu ig ix ll ny qu rr ss tg tj ts tx tz;!!!

define V [ a | à | e | è | é | i | í | ï | o | ò | ó | u | ú | ü | y ];
define C [ b | c | ç | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z ];

read lexc ./src/articles.lexc
define Articles;

read lexc ./src/nouns_masculine.lexc
define MascNouns;

read lexc ./src/nouns_feminine.lexc
define FemNouns;

regex MascNouns | FemNouns;
define Nouns;

read lexc ./src/adjectives.lexc
define Adjectives;

read lexc ./src/verbs.lexc
define Verbs;

define arVerbCorrecter {ar} -> 0 || _ {^};
define erVerbCorrecter {er} -> 0 || _ {^};
define irVerbCorrecter {ir} -> 0 || _ {^};

regex Articles | Nouns | Adjectives | [Verbs .o. arVerbCorrecter .o. irVerbCorrecter .o. erVerbCorrecter];

define Lexicon;



define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Grammar Lexicon .o. Cleanup;
regex Grammar;
